Utah statutes.
34-28-5.   Separation from payroll -- Resignation -- Cessation because of
industrial dispute.
(1) (a)  Whenever an employer separates an employee from the employer's
payroll the unpaid wages of the employee become due immediately, and the
employer shall pay the wages to the employee within 24 hours of the time of
separation at the specified place of payment.
(b) (i)  In case of failure to pay wages due an employee within 24 hours of
written demand, the wages of the employee shall continue from the date of
demand until paid, but in no event to exceed 60 days, at the same rate that
the employee received at the time of separation.
(ii)  The employee may recover the penalty thus accruing to the employee in a
civil action.  This action must be commenced within 60 days from the date of
separation.
(iii)  An employee who has not made a written demand for payment is not
entitled to any penalty under Subsection (1)(b).
(2)  If an employee  does not have a written contract for a definite period
and resigns  the employee's employment, the wages earned and unpaid together
with any deposit held by the employer and properly belonging to the resigned
employee for the performance of the employee's employment duties become due
and payable on the next regular payday.
(3)  If work ceases as the result of an industrial dispute, the wages earned
and unpaid at the time of this cessation become due and payable at the next
regular payday, as provided in Section 34-28-3, including, without abatement
or reduction, all amounts due all persons whose work has been suspended as a
result of the industrial dispute, together with any deposit or other guaranty
held by the employer for the faithful performance of the duties of the
employment.
(4)  This section does not apply to the earnings of a sales agent employed on
a commission basis who has custody of accounts, money, or goods of the sales
agent's principal if the net amount due the agent is determined only after an
audit or verification of sales, accounts, funds, or stocks.
